Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,283
Misbranded food; prohibited; misbranded, defined.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to misbrand any food or distribute, offer for sale, or sell any misbranded food.

(2) A food shall be deemed to be misbranded if:

(a) It does not bear labeling clearly stating (i) the identity of the food in terms likely to be easily and accurately understood by the consumer, (ii) the net quantity of contents of the food in terms authorized under the Weights and Measures Act, and (iii) the name and address of the manufacturer, distributor, or seller of the food; or

(b) Its labeling is false or misleading in any manner.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 33;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.29;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 52.

Weights and Measures Act, see section 89-182.01.